Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 2 Guardianship Appointed

29-2-65.
“Guardianship” defined; requirements of petition for transfer.

For purposes of this part and Part 3 of this article, the term “guardianship” refers to a legal relationship in which a person is given responsibility by a foreign court for the care of a minor, thereby becoming a guardian.

A guardian who has been appointed by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction may petition to have the guardianship transferred to and accepted in this state by filing a petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign guardianship in the court of the county in this state where the minor resides or may reside.

The petition shall include the following:

An authenticated copy of the foreign guardianship order including:

All attachments describing the duties and powers of the guardian; and

All amendments or modifications to the foreign guardianship order entered subsequent to the original order, including any order to transfer the guardianship;

The address of the foreign court which issued the guardianship order;

A listing of any other guardianship petitions that are pending in any jurisdiction and the names and addresses of the courts where the petitions have been filed;

The petitioner’s name, address, and county of domicile;

The name, age, and current address of the minor and the new or proposed address of the minor;

The names and current addresses of the adult siblings of the minor, if any;

The name and address of the person responsible for the care and custody of the minor, if other than the petitioner, and of any other person currently serving as guardian;

The name and address of any person currently acting as legal representative, other than the petitioner, including any legal counsel, guardian ad litem, or court visitor appointed by the foreign court for the minor;

The name and address of the minor’s conservator, if any; and

The reason the transfer is in the minor’s best interest.

The petition may be combined with other petitions related to the guardianship, including a petition to modify the terms of the guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, the second subsection (c), as enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, was redesignated as subsection (d).

29-2-66.
Notice to minor and foreign court; requirements of notice; notice to others; waiver of notice requirements.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign guardianship shall be served personally on the minor. The notice shall:

State that the minor has a right to a hearing on the petition;

Inform the minor of the procedure to exercise the minor’s right to a hearing; and

State that the minor has the right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint legal counsel for the minor unless the minor has retained counsel or legal counsel has been appointed by the foreign court to represent the minor in the transfer of the guardianship.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign guardianship shall be provided to the foreign court from which the guardianship is to be transferred. Notice to the foreign court shall include a request that the foreign court:

Certify whether:

The foreign court has any record that the guardian has engaged in malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance during the guardian’s appointment;

Periodic status reports have been filed in a satisfactory manner; and

All bond or other security requirements imposed under the guardianship have been performed; and

Forward copies of all documents filed with the foreign court relating to the guardianship including but not limited to:

The initial petition for guardianship and other filings relevant to the appointment of the guardian;

Reports and recommendations of guardians ad litem, court visitors, or other individuals appointed by the foreign court to evaluate the appropriateness of the guardianship;

Reports of physical and mental health practitioners describing the condition of the minor;

Periodic status reports on the condition of the minor; and

The order to transfer the guardianship.

Notice and a copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of the guardianship shall be mailed to all other persons named in the petition by first-class mail. The notice shall inform these persons of their right to object to the receipt and acceptance of the guardianship by this state.

The minor shall have 30 days from the date of service to request a hearing on the petition. All other persons to whom notice is given under this Code section shall have 30 days from the date of the mailing of the notice to request a hearing on the petition.

The court may waive the notice requirements of subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section if it finds that:

The guardian has filed a petition in the foreign court for transfer and release of the guardianship to this state;

Notice was given to the minor and all interested persons in conjunction with the petition for transfer and release of the guardianship;

The petitioner provides the court with an authenticated copy of the petition for transfer and release of the guardianship filed with the foreign court and proof that service was made on the minor not more than 90 days from the date the petition for receipt and acceptance of the guardianship is filed in the court; and

The minor is represented by legal counsel with respect to the petition in the foreign court.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-67.
Hearing on petition for receipt and acceptance of foreign guardian; stay of proceedings authorized if protest.

On the court’s own motion or upon timely motion by the minor or by any interested person, the court shall hold a hearing to consider the petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign guardian.

If any interested person challenges the validity of the foreign guardianship or the authority of the foreign court to appoint the guardian, the court may stay its proceeding while the petitioner is afforded the opportunity to have the foreign court hear the challenge and determine its merits.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-67

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-68.
Required findings of court prior to acceptance of foreign guardianship; orderly transfer; right to petition for guardianship remains.

The court may grant a petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign guardianship provided the court finds that:

The guardian is presently in good standing with the foreign court; and

The transfer of the guardianship from the foreign jurisdiction is in the best interest of the minor.

Subject to subsection (c) of this Code section, at all times following the entry of the order accepting the guardianship the laws of the State of Georgia shall apply to the guardianship.

In order to coordinate efforts with the foreign court to facilitate the orderly transfer of the guardianship, the court is authorized to:

Delay the effective date of the receipt and acceptance for a reasonable period of time;

Make the receipt and acceptance contingent upon the release of the guardianship or the termination of the guardianship and the discharge of the guardian in the foreign jurisdiction;

Recognize concurrent jurisdiction over the guardianship for a reasonable period of time to permit the foreign court to release the guardianship or to terminate the guardianship and discharge the guardian in the foreign jurisdiction; or

Make other arrangements the court deems necessary to effectuate the receipt and acceptance of the guardianship.

The denial of a petition for receipt and acceptance of the foreign guardianship does not affect the right of a guardian appointed by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction to petition for guardianship under Code Section 29-2-16.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-68

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.